Illinois, session 104th, HB4506.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 51A-70 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1A-70 new)7    Sec. 1A-70. Secure Elections Infrastructure Fund. The 8Secure Elections Infrastructure Fund is created as a special 9fund created in the State treasury. Subject to appropriation, 10moneys in the Fund shall be distributed by the State Board of 11Elections as grants to election authorities for: voting 12machine replacement; electronic poll book upgrades; 13cybersecurity hardening, including the purchase of hardware 14and software and vendor vetting; voter accessibility upgrades; 15infrastructure for secure ballot transport and storage; and 16capital improvements to election authority facilities that are 17necessary to maintain safe, secure, and effective election 18administration, including life-safety, environmental, 19structural, or operational upgrades. The State Board of 20Elections shall distribute moneys in the Fund to election 21authorities using a formula determined by the State Board of 22Elections that accounts for: the number of registered voters 23located in each voting district; the number of voting   HB4506- 2 -LRB104 19773 SPS 33223 b1districts under the jurisdiction of the election authority; 2the average age and condition of voting equipment operated by 3the election authority; appropriations received by the 4election authority in the previous 10 years; and demonstrated 5accessibility or cybersecurity needs. 6    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 7Section 5.1038 as follows: 8    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)9    Sec. 5.1038. The Secure Elections Infrastructure Fund.